South Africa: A Country where Irony is the Norm.
South Africa is a country full of ironies that will puzzle future researchers who study its records.
Take the Constitution, for example. It is the founding document of democratic and free South Africa, and the supreme law of the land. But reading it, one might think that the country’s most significant events only happened after White people arrived on its shores. The Constitution refers to redress and injustice of the past, implying that without White colonialism and apartheid, the majority Black population would live in harmony and equality.
Nothing could be further from the truth!

Part I: But not for White People, Black people would be living harmoniously.
While researching my book, “Getting to know yourself as a South African, Unravelling Xhosa History”, I was shocked to learn that there have been more conflicts and wars among Black people in this country than with White people. This means that more Black lives have been lost in these internal conflicts than in those with White people.
The word Xhosa itself, has its roots in the San language and means “Angry men”, which undoubtedly reflects a history of conflict. 
The split of the Xhosa and the Zulu was not peaceful, but violent and bloody. The rise of the Zulu Military Kingdom caused a series of conflicts and brutal wars between 1787 and 1828, displacing many people from their homes to new territories. This period, known as Mfecane saw so many being crushed under the hands of Shaka's mighty warriors, those whose lives weren’t crushed had their spirits crushed. The conquered were eventually assimilated into the small Zulu tribe, which grew so large that they are now collectively known as the Zulu people and today accounts for the biggest Nation in the country.
Until the early eighteen hundreds there was no such thing as the Xhosa nation as the Xhosa were one of many groups in the Eastern Cape area. So it’s not enough that we can’t get along as the different nations, but also within the Xhosa nation, the tribes within have warring pasts. The Xhosa nation only came to be after colonial pressures forced the different tribes in the Eastern Cape area to unite so as to mount a formidable force against colonial forces, which they did, albeit in vain. 
Until then, these people were as distinct as the Xhosa of today see themselves distinct from the Zulu. 
These distinctions have resulted in rivalry, like that between The amaGcaleka the Great House, and the amaRharhabe who are the Right Hand House. The two houses have been rivals for centuries, and have fought several wars over land, cattle, and power. Numerous conflicts have been documented between the Xhosa tribes after 1994 including the Mpondo and Mpondomise over chieftaincy, Xhosa and Mfengu over a farm and others, with more than 72 people dead just from these 2 incidents. Even today the different tribes within the Xhosa nation still see themselves as distinct, all with an interest of claiming superiority so as to receive more taxpayer support. 
In the late nineteen eighties and early nineteen nineties the violence between the Xhosa and Zulus resurfaced, especially in the townships around Johannesburg. The conflict was fueled by the political rivalry between the African National Congress (ANC), which had many Xhosa supporters, and the Inkatha Freedom Party (IFP), which was led by the Zulu chief Mangosuthu Buthelezi. 
During these conflicts, it is estimated that approximately ninety thousand Black individuals lost their lives. When combining this with the thirty-five thousand deaths in the conflicts between the Xhosa and the Zulu prior to apartheid, an uncomfortable reality begins to unfold. Surprisingly, the majority of murderers during this period were Black, accounting for around 60% of the total, followed by Whites. Furthermore, if we consider the number of Black people killed by their fellow Black citizens in democratic South Africa, the situation becomes even more alarming. In contrast, the apartheid era presented a different dynamic, where approximately 70% of the murderers were White and 25% were Black. 
However, it's worth noting that the absolute number of deaths during this 46-year period was only two hundred thousand. In contrast, the democratic era, which has lasted only 30 years thus far, has already witnessed double the apartheid figures.
Following the arrival of white people, there have been claims that the Xhosa and Zulu conflicts were influenced by the presence of the white man inciting division. However, regardless of whether this is true, it remains ironic that throughout history, we as black people have continued to commit acts of violence against each other, often with no external incentive. Presently, the majority black government has resulted in more death, poverty, and suffering than any other entity in the country. 
There have been numerous instances of black-on-black crime and looting, including the exploitation of black taxpayers and theft of the  extorted taxes that were meant for mostly Black people.
Many state-owned entities, primarily serving black people, now operate as glorified social grant systems, adding no real value to the country and relying on bailouts to function. When examining the historical conflicts between the Zulu and Xhosa, it is evident that we have been more inclined to engage in violence against each other as black people. 
Even after eradicating racism, we are at risk of reverting to tribalism, a pattern deeply ingrained in our history.

So much for Black people being united in the absence of White people!

Part II: But not for apartheid and colonialism Black people would be better off.
The Constitution, in its preamble claims to aim for a non-racial, non-sexist country, but nine sections later, it legitimises both racism and sexism in the name of redress. The irony of this is that, according to demographic data, the people who suffered the most from apartheid and colonialism, especially from the early 1900s to1994, also benefited the most.
There are many ways to measure the success of a species, but none are more absolute than population numbers. Dinosaurs, despite their size and success as apex predators, count for nothing since they are now extinct. The same goes for any species that failed to propagate and went extinct. They failed in the game of life.
From 1903 to 1994, the Black African population grew by 915%, followed by the indian/Asian population at 873%, Coloured at 709%, and Whites at 297%. The Black population had its largest growth between 1951 and 1996, only surpassed by the Coloured population in percentage terms, not absolute numbers. This was the period of the worst oppression for Black people, yet they increased the most in numbers. This is remarkable, considering that they started from a low base of about 8.5 million in 1951 and reached 35.5 million in 1996.
Compare this to the Jewish population, which suffered one of the most tragic events in history during World War II. Nazi Germany and its allies killed about six million Jews, reducing their population from 16.6 million in 1939 to 11 million in nineteen fifty-one. Many Jewish communities in Europe were destroyed, and the survivors faced trauma, displacement, and loss of identity. The world Jewish population reached 15.2 million by the end of 2020, still less than it was over 80 years ago on the eve of the Holocaust!
Another horrific event happened in 1994, when extremist Hutus killed an estimated 800,000 Tutsis and moderate Hutus in about 100 days. Before the massacre, the Tutsis were about 18% of the Rwandan population. The latest data I could find was from 2002. The percentage of the Tutsi population in Rwanda and Burundi is not officially known, but some sources estimate that it is about 14.8% and 14% of the total population, respectively.
Apartheid in South Africa, the Holocaust in Europe, and the Rwandan genocide are all crimes against humanity, according to the international community. The irony is that while the other crimes resulted in lasting and visible population decline, apartheid in South Africa, despite its evils, resulted in the largest population growth the targeted group has ever seen!
This growth was so big that it could not be replicated even after democracy.

Part III: Most women suffered disproportionately and thus deserve extra privileges.
The initial irony lies in portraying Black women as a homogeneous group, assuming shared aspirations that the patriarchy and apartheid supposedly denied. To comprehend the impact of these systems on women, it's crucial to analyze who bore disproportionate effects. Those aspiring to liberal lifestyles, formal education, careers, and interracial relationships were more impacted than those adhering to traditional roles.
The past 30 years have brought about significant changes, allowing women to pursue their dreams at the taxpayer's expense and providing ample clues about the proportion of women who were denied opportunities. Despite this, the majority of women still opt for traditional roles and marriage structures. This is reflected in the fact that most women, 20 years and above are, or have been married and prefer traditional living arrangements, showcasing a preference for traditional roles despite the opportunity to choose otherwise.
Women with diverse aspirations, including homemaking, weren't disproportionately affected by educational and employment denials. My mother exemplifies this; dedicating her life to homemaking, she invested time in raising my sisters and me. The only time she ever needed to work was for a brief period between my father’s death and me working. What my father couldn’t do after his demise I was there to succeed him. Both her and my sisters have been provided for at my expense such that all of them live so far above their means they couldn’t even afford their lifestyle if they joined their efforts.
It is ironic that despite being consistently stigmatized over the years, there are women who are happy being homemakers.
The majority of women who choose to be homemakers rely completely on their husbands for financial support. Women's empowerment initiatives are funded by taxes, which are mainly contributed by men who work to support their wives, aunts, daughters, sisters and girlfriends. This dynamic results in the funds for these programs ultimately coming from the majority of women at home, whom the man is responsible for providing for. 
It’s ironic that funds diverted to support women's empowerment ultimately undermine the very women that the man is committed to providing for. If women’s empowerment programs were really about empowering women, why would they do this at the expense of the majority of women who are provided for by men in their lives to support a minority of women that neither see any value in men nor want to be tied down by traditional roles? 
If history is anything to go by, and in this case it is, my niece has a far higher chance to succeed than most girls. This is not because of government women empowerment programs but because she has responsible men in her life in her father, brothers and uncles. She can afford to explore whatever career she aspires to and make the most of it, just like her mother and aunts. Her grandmother and great-grandmothers were able to excel in homemaking because of me, my father, uncle and grandfathers who provided for the women in our lives. 
Unfortunately, for Mila, she will never receive the full support she deserves from the men who work for her well-being. A considerable portion of their taxes will be directed towards women's redress programs. Ironically, there is no evidence in Mila's lifetime that the men in her life have mistreated or oppressed women, not her brothers, father, uncles, or even her grandfather and great-grandfathers. Yet, she must bear the consequences of distant women's suffering, who are more like mythical figures than real individuals. 
Even at best, we have seen the majority of tax funded women empowerment programs end up supporting only a select few cadre connected women while the bulk gets the crumbs. Ultimately, it is the majority of women who are slaving at home as homemakers who suffer the most due to her husband’s earnings that goes to other women who contribute nothing to her life. It is even more sickening to realise that since income tax is deducted before even the man gets his paycheck to take home, this implies that the women whom these empowerment programs target are priority claimants to the income of the man, a position that should be reserved for his wife, or any woman of his choosing.
Ultimately, it's ironic that men, through their income taxes, are supporting programs aimed at freeing women from traditional roles, by fulfilling  their traditional roles as providers for their families. The only exception now is that what we thought we worked for, to provide for the powerful women in our lives goes towards the government empowered women! 

Part IV: The Commission for Gender Equality: Rules for thee but not for me!
The South African Constitution established the Commission for Gender Equality (CGE) as a Chapter 9 institution. It supports constitutional democracy in the Republic. Its vision is “A society free from all forms of gender inequality” and its mission is “To promote, protect, monitor and evaluate gender equality through research, public education, policy development, legislative initiatives, effective monitoring and litigation.”
When the CGE started, about 60% of its staff were women. In the 2022/2023 Annual Performance Plan, the entity had 96 employees, with almost 93% being Black, 5% being Colored, and the rest including just one White employee and an Indian commissioner. All male staff members were Black, something that has improved since then looking at the entity’s website. Overall, female representation was around 67%, mostly Black, with 5 Colored female employees. 
Many like me might think that the Commissioners are the most powerful individuals in the commission. So, how do they look in terms of representation? Out of the 11 commissioners, 80% are Black with women accounting for 81% overall. As for the 9 provincial managers, over 70% are women. 
The country’s population is made up of approximately 81% Black individuals, 8.8% Colored individuals, 7.7% White individuals, and about 2.6% Indian individuals. It is important to note that females make up 51% of the total population, a substantial proportion of whom are below 20 years.
It’s ironic that the CGE’s employee profile does not match the country’s race and gender profile. One would expect an institution with oversight powers on the same subject and whose very existence is justified by the need to address inequality to try to set an example. 
One may argue that this is to redress the injustice that patriarchy and apartheid inflicted on women. Even if that was the case initially, this should have changed over time to match the demographics of the country. If the CGE was doing its job, the inequalities that justified its existence in the beginning should have been reduced by now. 
Upon reflection, it is quite ironic that as taxpayers, we expect the Commission to address the very issue it was created to tackle. If the CGE were to successfully fulfil its mission, what would be the reason for its continued existence? After all, why would any member of the commission have any interest in resolving the very problems they are assigned to fix, if their own job security is at stake?
It is ironic that the CGE cannot hire its own employees, considering that one of the requirements stated in section 3 of the Commission on Gender Equality Act, 1996 is the need to demonstrate a "record of commitment to the promotion of gender equality." Since the commission failed to uphold these criteria throughout its existence, it implies anyone who was associated with it now carries that record. 

Conclusion
My country is full of ironies.
We claim to aspire for non-sexism and non-racism, yet we entrench racial and sexist provisions in the Constitution. Even affirmative action, a policy that originated in America to protect the interests of minorities, is applied inconsistently here. If we were to adhere to the original spirit of affirmative action it is the minorities that would be protected, not the majorities! 
Imagine if we were to be what we aspired to be, a rainbow nation where everyone is equal before the law, irrespective of their race or gender? We would be the rainbow nation that embraces its differences but lives in harmony, instead of suspecting each other of getting unfair advantages based on race or gender. 
The irony is that while we, the ordinary people, suffer from high taxes, unemployment, poor living standards, and poverty, the politicians and public servants thrive without giving anything back to society, yet receiving their full salaries. 
It has been 30 years since South Africa achieved democracy, and the redress programs have been in effect for just as long. Considering that Apartheid lasted for 46 years, it is clear that these measures have surpassed their relevance. If the principle of proportionality suggests that the remedy must persist for the same duration as the initial wrongdoing, then we might rightly consider calling it what it is, revenge.
But, we will never, for political correctness.
That is Mzantsi for you. 
A country full of ironies!

South Africa is a country full of ironies that will baffle researchers a millenia or two when they look back to the country through its records.
Take the Constitution for starters, the founding document of democratic and free South Africa, as well as the most Supreme law of the land. A read through this document would have one thinking the country’s most memorable events only took place when White people landed on what would eventually be this country’s shores. The reference to redress and injustice of the past would have one thinking, but not for White people and their colonialism and apartheid, majority Black population which currently accounts for less than 10% of the population the country would be inhabited by a united people who knew nothing about violence and related to each other as equals.

 The irony about this is that nothing could be further from the truth!
For all their atrocities, I almost fell off my chair while researching my book “Getting to know yourself as a South African, Unravelling Xhosa History” to discover that there have been more conflicts and wars within the Black community than there have been with White people. This also means that quantitatively these intra race conflicts have claimed more Black lives than conflicts and wars with White people have. As the books looks into the history of the Xhosa people I explored their historical relationship with Zulu and Khoisan.
Even the world Xhosa, which has its San origins as “Angry men” itself has its roots in conflict.The split of the Xhosa and Zulu was not a harmonious event but one that was characterised by conflict and bloodshed. Then there is the rise of the Zulu Military Kingdom which resulted in a series of conflicts and brutal warfare between 1787 and 1828 that saw large people displaced at best from their homes to new territories. Those who were conquered by Shaka’s army would eventually be assimilated in the then small Zulu tribe that engulfed so much of the tribes in that area that they are now collectively known as Zulu people.
Until the 1800 there was no such thing as the Xhosa nation as the Xhosa were one of many groups in the Eastern Cape area. So it’s not enough that we can’t get along as the nations but also within the nations, the tribes within have warring pasts. The Xhosa nation only came to be after colonial pressures forced the different tribes in the Eastern Cape area to unite so as to mount a formidable force against colonial forces, which they did, albeit in vain. Until then, these people were as distinct as the Xhosa of today see themselves distinct from the Zulu. These distinctions have resulted in rivalry, like that between The amaGcaleka the Great House, and the amaRharhabe who are the Right Hand House. The two houses have been rivals for centuries, and have fought several wars over land, cattle, and power. These conflicts have been so prevalent that even today they exist as the different kingdoms within the Xhosa nation claim superiority so as to have more of the taxpayer money directed to them.    

The Constitution is so focused on the injustices of the past that, despite claiming to aspire towards a non-racial, non-sexism country, 9 sections later it legitimises both racism and sexism under the guise of redress. The irony about all of this, for all the injustice attributed to apartheid and the rest of colonialism, especially from the early 1900, quantitative demographic data shows the people who suffered the most were also the people who benefited disproportionally more.
There are many ways to measure success of a species but none are more absolute than population numbers. For all their size and success as a pex predators that counts for very little in favour of dinosaurs since they are now extinct as a species. The same goes for all species that failed to propagate and went extinct, absolutely they failed in the game of life. 
If then this is true, the alternative holds true as well. The species that have managed to not only live to the next generation but have increased their numbers could be said to be successful absolutely.
Between 1903 and 1994 the Black African Population experienced a 915% population increase, followed by the Coloured/ Asian population at 873%, Coloured at 709% with Whites coming last at 297%. In fact, the largest population increase the Black population has ever experienced was during the period between 1951 and 1996, surpassed only by the Coloured population but only in terms of percentage growth not absolute numbers. 
The period that Black people were supposedly under the worst oppression is also the period that the Black population of this country experienced the highest population grow, even in terms of absolute numbers! This says a lot, especially considering that the calculation between 1951 and 1996 started from a low base of about eight and half million people versus the thirty five and a half million people at the end of 1996.
Contrast these population trends to those of the Jewish population between 1939 and 1945 when they experienced one of the most tragic events, not only in their history but that of mankind. The genocide of about six million Jews by Nazi Germany and its allies during World War II had a devastating impact on the Jewish population, reducing it from 16.6 million in 1939 to 11 million in 19451. Many Jewish communities in Europe were wiped out, and survivors faced trauma, displacement, and loss of identity.
In a horrific event that took place in 1994, extremist Hutus massacred an estimated 800,000 Tutsis and moderate Hutus in about 100 days. Before the massacre the Tutsis were estimated to be about 18% of the Rwandan population. The only data i could find only goes up to 2002. The percentage of the Tutsi population in Rwanda and Burundi is not officially known  However, some sources estimate that the Tutsi population in Rwanda is about 14.8% of the total population, and in Burundi about 14% of the total population.
Apartheid in South Africa, The Holocous in Europe and Rwandan genocide are all declared crimes against humanity by the international community, the irony though is that while the other crimes against humanity resulted in lasting and visible decline in population, the Apartheid in South Africa, for all its evils resulted in the biggest population growth against the targeted population growth, so big that even after democracy it cannot be replicated.
As a result of the injustice of apartheid the largest population group in South Africa is ironically the most protected with privileges that justify the institution of the same discrimination that the current redress measures supposedly redress. It doesn’t stop there either because Black women also get extra protection and consequently extra favours.
The logic behind this is that as a group, in entirety women were oppressed by men. This oppression by the patriarchy resulted in them being denied opportunity to have formal education and employment that could allow them to be independent of their traditional roles. As a consequence of this women are now vulnerable as a group, and as such redress for the historical injustices is justified. The irony is not only in the fact that in terms of absolute numbers women are the majority, but that to effect redress that has confined women to their traditional roles they must be given extra favours funded by tax, of which most if it, the income tax at least is paid for by men, performing their traditional role of working to provide for their families.

Then there is The Commission for Gender Equality, a  Chapter 9 institution of the South African Constitution. Chapter 9 establishes a set of state institutions that support constitutional democracy in the Republic. Amongst these institutions is the Commission for Gender Equality (CGE).
The CGE’s vision is "A society free from all forms of gender inequality" while its mission is "To promote, protect, monitor and evaluate gender equality through research, public education, policy development, legislative initiatives, effective monitoring and litigation."
Among the entity's values which include independence, confidentiality and accountability, there is also a commitment to non-discrimination and ethical behaviour.
Initially, the CGE had a staff of 29 employees. In the 1997/1998 financial year, almost 70% of our budget was allocated to employee compensation. During that time, 62% of our staff consisted of women, while the remaining positions were occupied by men.
As per our 2022/2023 Annual Performance Plan, the staff complement has grown significantly to 229 employees, with 78.56% being female. In this period, 70% of our budget amounting to R100,722,000.00 was dedicated to employee compensation.
By now you would have noticed the glaring disparities between the commission’s employee profile relative to the country’s gender profile.
For an institution that supposedly stands for gender equality it is quite ironic that this institution has never even pretended to live this aspiration in its recruitment. While women have always been more than men, between 1996 this difference was not more than three percent and has been narrowing. The sex profile however of the employees of the entity that supposedly is entrusted with Gender equality has never even came close to reflecting this, and instead of equalising in line with the population trends it has widened more in favour of women.
One, of course may argue that this was to redress the injustice the patriarchy previously inflicted on women. I have dedicated almost a full chapter in my next book on looking to the validity of these claims so I won’t delve deep here. Suffice to say though that even if that was the case initially, surely over time this should have reflected the demographics of the country. If the Commission for Gender Equality was doing its job, the inequalities that justified its existence in the beginning should have decreased by now, otherwise like most other tax funded entities it is nothing more than a cadre rewarding program and a tool for looting. Where taxpayer more is concerned, anything that doesn’t add value is a liability.
My country is a country full of ironies. We claim to aspire for non sexism and non racism yet entrench racial and sexist provisions in the Constitution. Even affirmative action, a policy which has its roots in America was meant to protect the interests of minorities. One would think it is the White Population that benefits from this policy if its application was consistent with the concept but nope, here the majority Black population is the one protected and has entitlement with the majority Female population getting more tax funded protection and extra favours; most of which is funded by the minority, whether in terms of race or sex!



The Confluence of Cosmologies: A South African Xhosa's Reflection. Published on Linkedin on 270327

As a South African Xhosa native, standing at the intersection of science, culture, and spirituality, I am compelled to reflect on the narratives of the universe's origins that shape our understanding of existence. The funding of education and research, often sourced from the diverse contributions of taxpayers, each with their own religious, cultural, or scientific convictions, raises a critical question: Is it just to teach one theory as the prevailing truth while using the collective resources of a pluralistic society?

The Big Bang theory, widely accepted in scientific circles, posits that the universe expanded from an incredibly hot, dense point. Yet, it stops short of explaining the cause or origin of this singularity. Could a creator have set the initial conditions for the universe, leaving behind a cosmic blueprint that unfolded into the reality we observe? The Big Bang theory, for all its empirical support, does not negate the possibility of a creator, especially if such an entity's intervention was limited to initiating the singularity.

The danger of dismissing informal methods of tradition and culture is evident in South Africa's current socio-economic landscape. The country grapples with staggering youth unemployment rates, despite having the most formally educated generation to date. This predicament stems from a one-sided approach that has undervalued informal teaching and practical wisdom, which were the bedrock of skills passed down through generations.

Our parents and grandparents, many of whom received little to no formal education, acquired essential life skills through hands-on experience and domestic duties. These skills have become their sustenance, enabling them to support their adult children—children who, despite their diplomas and degrees, find themselves ill-equipped for self-sufficiency in a world that demands more than theoretical knowledge.

The prioritization of formal schooling, with its focus on abstract concepts over practical skills, has led to a generation that looks down on manual labor and traditional wisdom. This has resulted in a dependency syndrome, where the youth, unemployed and lacking basic life skills, rely on their elders for survival. The irony is stark: those who were taught informally are now the pillars for those who were formally educated.

In light of these reflections, I advocate for an educational system that embraces the multiplicity of narratives—scientific, religious, and cultural. Such a system would not only honor the contributions of all taxpayers but also foster a society that values diverse perspectives and practical wisdom. It is not about discarding the Big Bang theory or natural evolution but about presenting them alongside other narratives, allowing individuals to weigh the evidence and decide for themselves.

Education, particularly in a diverse society such as South Africa's, should not be about indoctrination but exploration. It should be a gateway to possibilities, encouraging critical thinking and respect for different worldviews. While the Big Bang theory is taught as the most substantiated scientific explanation, it should not be presented as the absolute truth but rather as the best explanation we have according to the scientific method.

As we navigate the complexities of education and cosmology, let us not forget the strength that lies in diversity. By valuing all narratives and teaching methods, we can cultivate a generation that is both scientifically informed and culturally grounded—a generation capable of shaping a future that honors the past while embracing the present.

Audio Article available: https://youtu.be/XZ10dJUIRZk?si=fvbcUFwJdIbUv2xt

---

This article, from the perspective of a South African Xhosa native, explores the delicate balance between scientific education and the respect for diverse cultural and spiritual beliefs. It underscores the importance of an inclusive approach to education that allows for the coexistence of multiple narratives and the preservation of practical wisdom.

Cosmologies, South African Xhosa, Science and culture, Spiritual reflection, Big Bang theory, Pluralistic society, Diversity in education, Cultural wisdom, Practical skills, Critical thinking, Homeschool, Public School, Private School, Tax-Payer, tax funded, qamata, god, jesus, 




Dismantling the Maternal Preference Bias: A Imperative for Children's Rights and Gender Equality

In a society striving for true equality and focused on upholding the best interests of its children, the enduring application of an archaic legal principle poses a formidable challenge. The maternal preference bias, which favors mothers over fathers in child custody battles based solely on gender stereotypes, continues to rear its unconstitutional head in many South African courtrooms. This prejudiced practice flagrantly disregards constitutional guarantees of equality and non-discrimination while undermining the sacrosanct "best interests of the child" standard. Allowing this injustice to persist unchecked will only perpetuate antiquated norms, erode family bonds, and compromise children's well-being - making its eradication an urgent national imperative.

The Astounding Resilience of a Discriminatory Relic
While the Children's Act of 2005 unequivocally abolished the maternal preference rule, ordaining impartial, individualized custody decisions based on objective factors, evidence suggests an alarming divergence between law and practice. A 2010-2013 study found mothers being awarded primary custody around 70% of the time in the Johannesburg Family Court. Though not conclusive proof of systemic bias, such lopsided figures raise red flags about persisting discriminatory mindsets privileging motherhood over equal parenting opportunities.

This tenacious maternal preference prejudice is an anachronistic relic of an era where women were stereotypically confined to domestic roles as nurturers while men explored careers. Its apparent renaissance in modern custody battles is an affront to South Africa's constitutional values of gender equality and non-discrimination. By axiomatically presuming mothers as superior caregivers, it institutionalizes unfair differential treatment solely based on sex - a violation of our society's pledge to provide equal protection and benefit of the law to all citizens regardless of gender.

Undermining the Best Interests of Children
Beyond perpetuating unconstitutional gender discrimination, the maternal preference bias strikes at the very heart of South Africa's commitment to upholding the preeminent "best interests of the child" standard in all matters concerning minors. This sacred principle demands a clear-eyed, individualized assessment of each parent's specific circumstances to determine which caregiving arrangement best attunes to the child's unique emotional, psychological and developmental needs.  

By substituting this holistic, child-centered analysis with a reductive, gendered presumption elevating mothers as preferred custodians, the maternal bias disregards critical factors that could favor fathers as primary caregivers in some cases. These include financial resources, work flexibility, quality of parent-child relationships and ability to provide emotional support - elements that transcend gender in determining a nurturing environment.  

In favoring mothers by default, this bias ignores real-world scenarios where fathers may objectively be better positioned to serve as primary caregivers. From stay-at-home fathers to scenarios where mothers face issues like substance abuse or other limitations, focusing solely on gender deprives children of upbringings tailored optimally to their individual requirements.  

A Paradox Perpetuating Harmful Stereotypes
Paradoxically, the maternal preference principle, while putatively favoring mothers, ultimately perpetuates pernicious gender stereotypes that relegate women to narrowly prescribed domestic roles. By presuming inherent "maternal instincts," it enshrines antiquated identities of women as biologically destined to be primary caregivers rather than autonomous individuals with equitable rights to professional pursuits alongside childrearing responsibilities.  

On the flipped side, presuming fathers as secondary caregivers devalues the importance of equitable fatherhood while enabling societal narratives that undermine involved paternal parenting. Rather than assessing caregiving capacity impartially, it resurrects atavistic norms that constrain both genders' abilities to define their family roles based on individual context rather than rigid generalizations.

In a nation rebuilding itself on values of human dignity and equality, such regressive prejudices have no place codified into legal practice, especially when concerning the most vulnerable members of society - children. Eliminating this relic is imperative to uphold the egalitarian spirit of South Africa's democracy.

The Catalyzing Impact of Closed Custody Proceedings 
While the endurance of the maternal bias in some custody decisions is concerning enough, what catalyzes this persisting injustice is the closed nature of Children's Court proceedings. Unlike other courts bound by open justice principles allowing public observation, custody cases involving minors occur partially or fully shielded from public scrutiny under the justification of preserving child privacy.

However well-intentioned, this opaque process has had the pernicious consequence of insulating custody decisions from public oversight, transparency and accountability. With no observers monitoring adherence to constitutional principles and legal standards, some courts have the concerning ability to perpetuate discriminatory mindsets like the maternal preference bias with limited recourse or public reckoning.

This lack of scrutiny not only perpetuates injustice but compounds a deficit of public trust in the impartiality and fidelity of custody proceedings. When decisions impacting children's lives and families' futures occur behind closed doors, it fuels perceptions, fair or not, of      irregularities, unchecked biases and improper conduct shielded from sunshine.

Imperative Reforms: Balancing Child Privacy and Open Justice
To elevate South Africa's Children's Courts as beacons of impartial justice and foster public confidence that all custody decisions serve the best interests of children, reforms mandating a balanced approach prioritizing both child privacy and transparent accountability are crucial:

1) Issuing Detailed, Public Custody Rulings: All custody decisions should be issued as written, reasoned judgments that outline relevant factors, legal tests applied and rationales behind rulings while protecting children's anonymity. These rulings,  stripped of identifying details, should be open for public scrutiny and analysis.

2) Selective Open Proceedings: Exploring mechanisms to have portions of custody proceedings open to public observers like officers monitoring adherence to legal principles without compromising child privacy.

3) External Judicial Oversight: Establishing an independent monitoring commission empowered to observe Children's Courts nationwide, identify concerning practices or judgments exhibiting discriminatory patterns like maternal bias tendencies, and recommend interventions.

4) Mandating Comprehensive Anti-Bias Training: Instituting compulsory, regular anti-bias training for all custody court judicial officers to root out subconscious gender biases through evidence-based programs prompting introspection and awareness.

5) Enhancing Appeals Accessibility: Reforming appeals processes to reduce costs and procedural barriers, enabling robust corrective action through higher court reversals of custody rulings perpetuating discrimination like the maternal bias.

Only through such multilayered reforms upholding both equal justice under law and safeguarding child privacy can the prejudiced paradigm of favoring mothers be fully excised from custody jurisprudence. The constitutional rights of parents to equality and children's cardinal interests both demand nothing less.

South Africa's democratic trajectory has been defined by the tenacity to confront injustice and dismantle remnants of discriminatory practices incompatible with a just society. Allowing the maternal preference bias to endure further in any form represents a betrayal of that noble commitment to human rights. It is time we eradicate this relic conclusively in service of upholding all parents' dignity, validating children's needs as paramount, and securing equal protection under the law for all regardless of gender.


Redressing Injustice or Harming Our Children? The Case Against Affirmative Action in South Africa

Introduction: The Noble Intentions of Redress Policies
In a nation founded on the principles of equality and human dignity, South Africa's commitment to redressing the injustices of the past has been a noble endeavour. However, the implementation of affirmative action, employment equity, and other redress programs has given rise to unintended consequences that threaten to undermine the very foundations upon which our democracy stands.

The Paradox of Presumed Guilt
At the heart of this issue lies a fundamental contradiction: these programs inherently presume the guilt of entire demographic groups based solely on their race or gender. This presumption of guilt stands in direct opposition to the constitutional principle of the presumption of innocence, a cornerstone of any just legal system.

The Impact on Children
From birth, white children and young boys are presumed guilty of the sins of their ancestors, condemned to bear the consequences of crimes they did not commit. This not only contradicts the presumption of innocence but also violates the constitutional mandate that the best interests of the child must be the paramount consideration in all matters involving them. The impact of these policies goes beyond the immediate beneficiaries.  Consider employment equity, which prioritises previously disadvantaged groups.  A white parent denied an opportunity has children relying on their income.  Similarly, a young man denied a scholarship due to gender quotas may carry resentment that could influence his future parenting or relationships with women and girls.

Equality Before the Law
By treating children unequally based on immutable characteristics such as race and gender, redress programs perpetuate the very discrimination they claim to redress, failing to uphold the fundamental principle of equality before the law.

Lessons from Family Law Reforms
The abolition of South Africa's maternal preference rule and tender years doctrine highlighted the harms of gender-based presumptions in family law, yet, as of 2024, many children's courts continue to apply these outdated standards. This ongoing issue under the oversight of the High Court as the upper guardian of children contradicts the women empowerment movement's aims and modern initiatives to alleviate traditional caregiving roles imposed on women. 
Despite significant legal reforms aimed at eliminating gender discrimination, a disproportionate amount of resources—largely financed by tax contributions from men since 1994—has been allocated to programs specifically supporting women and girls, often excluding men and boys. Yet, there has been no comparable enthusiasm or funding to promote the integration of boys and men in domestic roles. 
Under the oversight of the High Court and other Chapter 9 institutions, which are tasked with upholding the Constitution, children’s courts persist in these practices. Meanwhile, the High Court addresses these issues only sporadically, focusing more on the symptoms rather than the root causes of these systemic problems.

Institutional Decay and Its Implications
Moreover, the implementation of redress programs has facilitated the infiltration of incompetent and corrupt individuals into positions of power and influence across South African institutions. As meritocracy is eroded, political connections and cronyism become the primary determinants of success, enabling the looting of public resources and the collapse of essential services.

Societal Divisions and Intergenerational Trauma
Redress programs have the potential to create a ripple effect, impacting not just the intended beneficiaries but future generations.  Discrimination against a father today can negatively affect his children's well-being.  Furthermore, these policies can foster a sense of grievance or entitlement across racial and gender lines, potentially shaping how future generations view themselves and others.
Redress programs have exacerbated societal divisions and perpetuated the very prejudices they sought to eradicate. White individuals and men harbour resentment towards groups perceived as beneficiaries of these programs, while those designated as "previously disadvantaged" often justify their failures through the lens of historical injustice, absolving themselves of personal accountability.

A Call for Principled Reform
In light of these profound contradictions and detrimental consequences, a principled re-evaluation of redress programs is imperative. By prioritising the best interests of the child, upholding the presumption of innocence, and promoting true equality before the law, South Africa can chart a path towards a more just and equitable future for all its citizens, regardless of their race or gender.

Conclusion: Reclaiming South Africa's Moral Compass
It is time for South Africa to reclaim its moral compass and recommit itself to the ideals upon which our democracy was founded. Our children deserve a future where their potential is not limited by the prejudices of the past but is instead nurtured and celebrated, regardless of their race or gender. Only by dismantling the presumptions of guilt and embracing a child-centric approach can South Africa heal its divisions, restore the integrity of its institutions, and create a society where every child, regardless of their skin colour or gender, has an equal opportunity to thrive.


The High Court's Failure as the Upper Guardian: Holding the Judiciary Accountable for Perpetuating Paternal Discrimination

The Constitution of South Africa enshrines the principles of equality, non-discrimination, and the fundamental rights of children. Section 9 prohibits unfair discrimination based on gender, while Section 28 emphasises that the best interests of the child are of paramount importance in every matter concerning them. Furthermore, the High Court holds the esteemed role of the upper guardian of all children, a responsibility that demands unwavering vigilance in upholding these constitutional tenets.

The Persistent Scourge of the Maternal Preference Rule
Despite these clear constitutional imperatives, a disturbing trend persists within the South African legal system – the continued application of the discredited maternal preference rule in child custody cases. This antiquated doctrine, which presumes mothers to be inherently superior caregivers, not only perpetuates gender discrimination against fathers but also undermines the best interests of children by denying them the opportunity to develop strong bonds with both parents.

Alarmingly, even in 2024, fathers continue to face systemic bias within the Children's Courts, forced to prove beyond reasonable doubt their worthiness to exercise their constitutionally guaranteed equal parental rights and responsibilities. This blatant discrimination not only violates the principles of equality and non-discrimination but also directly impacts the well-being of children, depriving them of the invaluable benefits of involved fatherhood.

The High Court's Dereliction of Duty as the Upper Guardian
It is a travesty that, more than two decades into our constitutional democracy, the High Court, as the upper guardian of all children, has failed to decisively intervene and rectify this injustice. While significant strides have been made in eliminating gender discrimination against women in the formal sectors of employment and education, little to no effort has been made to integrate fathers into the domestic sphere and uphold their equal parental rights.

The continued application of discriminatory practices within the Children's Courts, coupled with the High Court's inaction, stands in stark contrast to the constitutional imperative of upholding the best interests of the child. This dereliction of duty has profound consequences, as children grow up disadvantaged by the absence of their fathers' full involvement, not due to paternal neglect but rather due to institutionalised discrimination sanctioned by the very institutions entrusted with their protection.

The High Court's Inaction: A Betrayal of Children, Families and the Constitution

The Commission for Gender Equality has recognized that certain provisions within the Children's Act discriminate against fathers, a long-standing concern raised by fathers and advocates. This acknowledgment by a constitutionally mandated body underscores the necessity for the High Court's intervention to rectify issues impacting the well-being of children.

Despite this clear call to action, the High Court's response has been tepid. Rather than addressing the fundamental issues, the court has sporadically tackled only the symptoms, failing to decisively rectify the discriminatory legal practices. This lacklustre approach falls short of the High Court's duty to uphold the constitutional rights of children and maintain equality before the law.

By allowing these discriminatory provisions to persist, the High Court tacitly endorses practices that violate the principle of equality, contradicting the protective mandates enshrined in the Constitution. Such inaction suggests a troubling acceptance of bias against fathers in parental rights issues, despite official recognition of the problem.

Moreover, most proceedings in children's courts occur behind closed doors, deviating from the long-established principle of open courts that ensures transparency and public accountability. While this privacy is ostensibly designed to protect children, in reality, it often shields magistrates in children's courts from public scrutiny. This becomes particularly evident as few cases reach the appeal stage.

Contrary to claims, the secrecy provision—which is intended to protect vulnerable children—rarely involves the children directly as most proceedings occur between parents, magistrates, and their legal representatives, if present. This situation illustrates a misuse of a provision meant to safeguard privacy, which instead protects court personnel, with the High Court failing to implement adequate oversight measures. The absence of increased oversight or any significant accountability measures for children's courts has led to a lack of public scrutiny, undermining the justice system’s integrity and efficacy.

This judicial inertia not only undermines the foundations of equality and non-discrimination but also directly affects children, who miss out on the benefits of having both parents equally involved. It perpetuates a cycle of injustice with profound implications for families and society at large.

Holding the High Court Accountable: Avenues for Citizen Action
In the face of this egregious dereliction of duty, it is incumbent upon the citizens of South Africa to hold the High Court accountable and demand action. Fortunately, our democratic society provides various avenues for recourse, ranging from the least expensive to more resource-intensive options.

One avenue is to utilise the Promotion of Access to Information Act (PAIA) to request information from the High Court regarding its efforts to address paternal discrimination within the legal system and uphold the best interests of the child. This information can shed light on the High Court's decision-making processes and potentially expose any shortcomings or negligence in fulfilling its constitutional obligations.

Additionally, the Promotion of Administrative Justice Act (PAJA) provides a legal framework for challenging administrative decisions or actions that may be unlawful, unreasonable, or procedurally unfair. Citizens can explore the possibility of challenging the High Court's inaction or perceived failure to address paternal discrimination through this avenue.

Furthermore, the office of the Public Protector offers a valuable resource for investigating allegations of maladministration, abuse of power, or improper conduct within state institutions, including the judiciary. Lodging a complaint with the Public Protector can initiate an independent inquiry into the High Court's handling of paternal rights and its role as the upper guardian of children.

A Call for Immediate Action and Accountability
The persistent discrimination against fathers within the legal system and the High Court's failure to address this injustice have far-reaching consequences that extend beyond the immediate impact on individual families. It is a contributing factor to the dire socioeconomic realities faced by the generation born after 1994, a generation that should have been protected and nurtured by the High Court in its role as the upper guardian.

Despite access to opportunities and resources that their parents never had, and despite trillions of taxpayer funds invested in education, health, welfare, and social programs, this generation remains mired in poverty, unemployment, and dependence on their elders. The High Court's inaction has perpetuated a cycle of disadvantage, undermining the very principles of equality and child protection enshrined in our Constitution.

It is time to hold the High Court accountable for its dereliction of duty and demand immediate action to rectify this injustice. By leveraging the tools at our disposal, such as PAIA, PAJA, and the Public Protector's office, we can shine a light on this issue and compel the High Court to uphold its constitutional mandate as the upper guardian of all children.

The future of our nation's children and the integrity of our legal system depend on our collective resolve to confront this systemic discrimination and ensure that the principles of equality, non-discrimination, and the best interests of the child are upheld without exception. Only then can we truly claim to be a society that values the rights and well-being of all its citizens, regardless of gender or any other immutable characteristic.


The Maternal Preference Paradox - Preserving Child Privacy at the Cost of Equal Justice?

For decades after South Africa's democratic transition, a legal spectre has loomed over the country's commitment to gender equality and protecting the best interests of children - the enduring maternal preference rule. Despite being formally abolished, this outdated legal principle that favored mothers over fathers in child custody cases has persisted, enabled by a lack of transparency in the very courts meant to safeguard children's rights.

The Historical Baggage of Maternal Preference
Rooted in antiquated gender norms, the maternal preference rule was premised on the belief that mothers were inherently better nurturers and caregivers for children, especially those of tender years. This presumption formed the bedrock of custody decisions for generations, perpetuating stereotypes that confined women to domestic roles while enabling men's careers.

The Constitutional Shift: Best Interests and Equality Before the Law
However, South Africa's progressive post-apartheid laws sought to dismantle such biases. The Children's Act of 2005 unequivocally abolished the maternal preference principle, mandating that all custody matters be decided solely based on the 'best interests of the child' - a gender-neutral standard considering factors like each parent's circumstances, relationship with the child, and ability to care for their needs.

Additionally, the Constitution enshrines the right to equality and prohibits unfair discrimination on the basis of gender, among other grounds. By giving an automatic advantage to mothers based on their sex, the maternal preference rule stood in violation of these constitutional guarantees of equal treatment.

The Paradox: Evidence of Persisting Bias
Yet, evidence suggests an alarming paradox - despite these legal injunctions, the maternal preference bias continues to manifest in custody decisions across South Africa. Research by the University of Pretoria analyzing cases between 2010-2013 found mothers were awarded primary custody around 70% of the time in the Johannesburg Family Court.

While case-specific factors could potentially explain some of this disparity, legal experts have raised concerns about an insidious, subconscious maternal bias persisting among some judicial officers - especially at the magistrate court level which handles most child custody matters.

The Privacy Paradox: Lack of Public Scrutiny
Compounding this issue is a unique paradox surrounding Children's Courts - their proceedings occur fully or partially closed to the public. Originally intended to protect the privacy and dignity of the children involved, this lack of transparency has had the unintended consequence of shielding the courts' work from public scrutiny.

In contrast to the principle of open justice that governs other courts, allowing for public observers to monitor court conduct and adherence to legal principles, Children's Courts operate away from watchful eyes. This absence of scrutiny opens the door for potentially unconstitutional practices like the application of the discarded maternal preference rule to persist unchecked.

The Shortcomings of Closed Proceedings
While preserving child privacy is a laudable goal, the current system of closed Children's Court proceedings suffers from critical shortcomings:

1) Lack of public accountability: With no external oversight, there are limited checks to ensure these courts consistently uphold the best interests of the child standard and eschew gender biases.

2) Opacity enabling misconduct: The veil of privacy could enable some judicial officers to inappropriately or even illegally revert to biased principles like maternal preference with no public reckoning.

3) Limited mechanisms for corrective action: Appeals provide a limited avenue for accountability, but are reactive and inaccessible to many due to costs and procedural barriers.

4) Deficit of trust: Closed proceedings contribute to a deficit of public trust, fueling perceptions that Children's Courts could be making biased decisions insulated from scrutiny.

The Call for Reform: Balancing Privacy and Open Justice
To uphold the constitutional principles of equality, non-discrimination, and acting in the best interests of children, reforms are imperative to strike a balance between preserving child privacy and ensuring Children's Courts are subject to public scrutiny and accountability:

1) Transparent, reasoned judgments: Requiring detailed written judgments with sound legal reasoning for all custody decisions. These judgments, while protecting child identities, could be open for public scrutiny.

2) Partial open proceedings: Exploring mechanisms, like allowing select public observers, to bring Children's Courts under the ambit of open justice principles.

3) External oversight: Establishing independent bodies to monitor and report on Children's Court conduct nationwide, identifying concerning trends or judgments.

4) Judicial training: Comprehensive, mandatory training for judicial officers to confront subconscious gender biases and eliminate the maternal preference mindset.

5) Accessible appeals: Enhancing access to appeals processes to enable robust corrective action against questionable custody decisions.

The path forward is clear - by increasing transparency while preserving child protections, South Africa can ensure its Children's Courts truly uphold the equal constitutional rights of all parents and embody the spirit of the best interests of the child principle. Only then can the maternal preference paradox be resolved in favor of genuine justice for all families.


The Insidious Echoes of Maternal Preference Bias - When Custody Injustice Catalyzes A Cycle of Societal Ills

In South Africa's robust pursuit of a more equitable society, few arenas warrant more vigilance against injustice than those impacting the nation's most vulnerable - its children. Yet in the realm ofChild Custody Courts, an insidious paradox has endured whereby the very legal paradigms intended to secure children's paramount interests have fallen hostage to anachronistic prejudices. The perseverance of the maternal preference bias, which axiomatically presumes mothers as preferable primary caregivers, flouts constitutional guarantees while catalyzing ripple effects that reverberate across South African society's most intractable challenges - from soaring youth crime and unemployment to endemic gender-based violence.

The Legal and Ethical Infringement
While the Children's Act of 2005 unequivocally abolished the antiquated maternal preference rule, robust evidence suggests its discriminatory specter has been reanimated on an alarming scale across Child Custody Courts. Analysis of cases from 2010-2013 found mothers being awarded primary custody privileges a lopsided 70% of the time in the Johannesburg Family Court. While not conclusive proof of overt systemic bias, such skewed outcomes aligned with anecdotal accounts from legal experts rings alarm bells about judicial officers perpetuating prejudicial presumptions rooted more in gender stereotypes than objective evaluations of child needs.  

Beyond representing a prima facie violation of constitutional equal protection guarantees prohibiting discrimination based on gender or sex, this apparent judicial reversion to the maternal preference mindset is an affront to South Africa's paramount ethical and legal duty - upholding the "best interests of the child" standard. A sacrosanct principle demanding individualized child custody decisions anchored in clear-eyed assessments of each parent's respective ability to nurture young emotional, developmental and psychological well-being based on their unique circumstances and child-parent relationship qualities. 

By substituting this impartial, child-centered analysis with reductive presumptions automatically prioritizing motherhood, the maternal bias sabotages the meticulous balancing process of evaluating critical factors like financial resources, professional flexibility, interpersonal parent-child bonds, emotional supportiveness and caregiving capabilities. Elements that could objectively tilt custody decisions in favor of fathers as primary caregivers are instead trivialized by this lingering preference for archaic gender norms dictating narrow domestic roles for women.

The Echoes of Inequality: Cycles of Violence, Crime, Unemployment
Yet the insidious impact of perpetuating this unconstitutional, discriminatory practice extends far beyond the injustice and ethical breaches confined to South Africa's Child Custody Courts. Like an infectious societal pathogen, the echoes of this iniquity have contributed to broader cycles fueling some of the nation's most pernicious challenges - from rampant gender-based violence, to soaring youth criminality and unemployment rates.

When children are denied the opportunity to be raised in caregiving environments optimally nurturing their overall developmental needs, instead thrust into suboptimal family arrangements dictated by prejudicial judicial biases, it brazenly disregards their interests as a preeminent priority. This early trauma of having their emotional bonds, psychological foundations, and caregiving stability shafted due to legal injustices reverberates into future generations.

Numerous longitudinal studies have identified childhood adversities and attachment disruptions stemming from suboptimal caregiving arrangements as potent risk factors elevating vulnerability to anti-social behaviors, criminal conduct, mental health afflictions and chronic unemployment spanning the transition into adulthood. In essence, when society systemically ignores best practices shielding child well-being in the name of preserving antiquated prejudices, it is catalyzing downstream consequences detrimental to those very children's future prospects and societal trajectories.

This deleterious domino effect is compounded by the cyclical impacts the maternal preference prejudice inflicts in subjugating fathers to marginalized roles while reinforcing constrictive identities for mothers confined to domestic nurturing. By stereotypically prioritizing mothers as preferred custodians based on rigid biological essentialism, it denies many mothers autonomous identities beyond circumscribed homemaker roles. This disempowers them from charting independent professional and economic trajectories equitably alongside child-rearing - an oppressive double burden perpetuating financial dependence on male partners.

This lack of female economic empowerment, catalyzed by coercive maternal stereotypes regressively codified in legal practice, becomes a catalytic risk factor in cyclic episodes of poverty, gender-based violence and unstable family units. Studies consistently identify intimate partner violence as more prevalent in relationships where women are economically dependent on male breadwinner partners due to lack of self-sufficiency or participation in formal workforces. When Child Custody Courts further entrench these dynamics through maternal bias, they actively enable environments where gender-based domestic violence, with its traumatic impacts on children's developmental trajectories, is more prevalent.

Furthermore, when fathers are presumed secondary or tertiary caregiving roles, it cultivates cultures of diminished responsibility and uninvolved fatherhood. With society already normalizing male idleness and professional prioritization over active co-parenting, the maternal preference compounds these corrosive narratives. Children cycled through absentee fathering are deprived of vital male role models, increasing susceptibility to anti-social behaviors, substance abuse and criminal delinquency influenced by environmental conditioning. This paternal abandonment further propels single-mother adversity, with all its associated socioeconomic obstacles.

Ultimately, while cloaked in seeming pro-women benevolence, the maternal preference prejudice is a supremely patriarchal time-warp sustaining antiquated norms that inhibit both genders' equitable agency. It restricts female autonomy by stereotyping women as predestined for obligated motherhood above personal/professional self-actualization. Symmetrically, it subverts the dignity and responsibilities incumbent to fathers as equitable co-parents and role models. When wielded as a legal instrument dictating domestic arrangements, it becomes a regressive tool perpetuating cycles where children are deprived nurturing environments tailored for their optimal developmental ascendance - instead marinating in childhood adversities extensively linked to later violence, substance abuse, teen pregnancies, educational underachievement, unemployment and sustained poverty.

The Imperative of Equity and Accountability: Reclaiming Judicial Impartiality
To disrupt these malignant cycles and alleviate some of South Africa's most deeply rooted societal ills implicating its youth and most vulnerable citizens, confronting and eradicating the maternal preference philosophy from Child Custody jurisprudence is an urgent national imperative. Only by upholding the cardinal constitutional standards of equality before the law and non-discrimination can these courts honorably fulfill their mandate of serving the best interests of children. This is a legal, ethical and moral obligation - not a discretionary option.

Given the catalyzing role an opaque, unaccountable judiciary has played in the preservation of this unconstitutional prejudice, reforms instilling transparency and accountability measures are critical:

1) Public Custody Rulings: All custody decisions must issue written, reasoned judgments expositing legal tests applied, factors evaluated and ruling rationales - with judgments published after stripping all identifying child details to prioritize privacy. This public scrutiny mechanism deters biased decision-making.

2) External Judicial Oversight: An independent commission empowered to observe Child Custody Courts nationally, identify discriminatory patterns like the maternal bias tendencies, and issue public reports catalyzing interventions and remedial judicial training programs.  

3) Open Custody Proceedings: Exploring methods like pooled anonymization to enable public monitored access to portions of custody proceedings - upholding principles of open justice and public accountability of judicial fidelity to law.

4) Enhancing Appeals Accessibility: Streamlining appeals processes by reducing fees and procedural barriers, enabling higher court reversals of custody decisions manifesting unconstitutional discrimination or deviations from legal standards.  
  
5) Stringent Judicial Training: Mandatory, robust evidence-based training programs to foster judicial introspection of any subconscious gender biases enabling discriminatory philosophical hangovers like the maternal preference.

Only through concerted, holistic accountability reforms recalibrating the scales of Child Custody justice can this insidious prejudice be conclusively dislodged from legal practice. Too much is at stake for South African children to waver on this imperative - their psychological and developmental foundations must neither be upended by discriminatory legal norms, nor marinated in family environments ill-suited for nurturing their ascendance due to judicial biases.

Building a Just, Progressive Society: Embracing Gender-Equal Parenting
If South Africa is to construct a truly progressive society elevating its human rights credentials on the global stage, realigning custody court practices with robust commitments to gender-equal parenting is mission critical. This means comprehensively validating both mothers' and fathers' rights to equitably share caregiving duties and responsibilities in a manner that centralizes each individual child's holistic interests based on bespoke circumstances - not reductive gender assumptions.

For mothers, the decommissioning of the maternal preference bias unlocks emancipation from constrictive narratives strapping them to obligated homemaking identities. Their interests in harmonizing personal growth, economic self-determination and professional pursuits coequally alongside childrearing duties must garner equal judicial respect as caregiving factors, not be subjugated on prejudiced presumptions of biological determinism.

Simultaneously, fatherhood must be redeemed as a dignified masculine identity inspiring responsibility, emotional nurturing and hands-on involvement. Stigmas portraying active paternal caregiving as effiminizing or compromising breadwinning capacity warrant jurisprudential repudiation. Courts embracing the preeminence of children's considerations over archaic gender prototypes signal a decisive philosophy that catalyzes cultural reformations elevating involved fathers as role models, not aberrations.

In essence, eliminating the maternal custody presumption as an unconstitutional relic compels Child Custody Courts to treat all parents as autonomous individuals. Their caregiving capacities are then grounded in nuanced, impartial and evidence-based evaluations of unique situational factors - not prejudicial gendered generalizations. With neither mothers nor fathers encumbered by stereotypical presumptions, true equality of consideration and legal treatment is finally enabled.

Family units then organically restructure themselves not around predetermined parent identities rooted in discrimination, but flexible dynamics best attuning to the holistic success and development of their offspring as humans. In turn, generations perpetuating cycles of childhood adversities, gender disempowerment, violence, crime and economic underachievement see these pernicious trajectories progressively disrupted.

Ultimately, societies striving to ascend into progressive governance models, human rights fidelity and broadly shared existential prosperity cannot sustainably do so if their most vulnerable children are systematically exposed to legal injustices neutering equitable prospects from the cradle. South Africa's democratic renaissance represents an opportunity to eradicate the maternal bias prejudice not only for restorative justice - but proactively cultivating social renovations where its youth ascend unencumbered by discrimination's cyclical plagues.

For a nation embodying "Ubuntu" principles of humanist solidarity, collectively deconstructing judicial norms perpetuating discriminatory denigration of parents and destabilizing childhoods is not optional, but existentially vital. The welfare and empowerment of future generations hinges on embracing a holistic respect for the constitution's equal protection under law - including in Child Custody Courts. Only then can the nation's profound potential for harmonizing diverse families into unified national upliftment be achieved.


The Roots of a Gender-Based Violence Crisis? Questioning the Maternal Preference Rule

By 2024, South Africa's struggle with unacceptably high rates of gender-based violence and violent crime has reached crisis proportions. While the roots of these issues are multifaceted, one potential contributing factor lies in a long-standing legal principle applied in South African child custody cases - the maternal preference rule. 

The maternal preference rule, though not codified in law, has been the prevailing practice in most South African courts for decades. It establishes a legal presumption that young children, especially those of "tender years," should reside primarily with their mother after a divorce or separation, all other factors being equal.

Proponents argue the rule serves the best interests of the child by preserving maternal care and stability. However, critics contend it is an unconstitutional, archaic standard based on outdated gender stereotypes about childcare roles.

More gravely, some evidence suggests the maternal preference rule's widespread application has had profoundly negative societal impacts by systematically depriving millions of South African children of meaningful paternal presence and influence during their formative years.

"We've created a culture where far too many boys are raised entirely in female-headed households without a positive male figure to guide their development into healthy manhood," says family law professor Amanda Lieutendu. "Absentee fatherhood begets disconnected, angry young men who struggle with emotional regulation and respect for women."

A 2021 study published in the South African Journal of Science found that children raised by single mothers were more likely to drop out of school, have teen pregnancies, abuse substances, and engage in violent crime later in life compared to children from two-parent homes.

Disturbingly, a small but rising number of cases have occurred where estranged sons raised solely by single mothers have even turned to violently attacking or sexually assaulting their own mothers in adulthood after years of deteriorating family relationships.

One such horrific case from 2023 involved Thabo Mosia, who was granted sole custody of his infant son by a divorcing judge citing the maternal preference rule over the mother's objections of being a devoted, capable parent. As the embittered son reached adulthood, their relationship became increasingly strained until Mosia murdered his mother during a brutal assault.

"I don't know what I could have done differently as a mom," stated the victim's sister. "Maybe if Thabo's father had been allowed to stay involved, he could have been a positive influence, a male role model to prevent this violent path."

While most legal experts concur the maternal preference should be abolished in favor of a rebuttable presumption of equal shared parenting post-divorce, effecting such a shift has proved an arduous political battle as of 2024.

"The paradox is that legal standards like the maternal preference rule were originally designed to benefit children," notes Lieutendu. "But when such rules deprive millions of kids of equal nurturing from both parents based on antiquated gender biases, it ends up actively undermining their wellbeing and chances for success as adults in our society."

As South Africa grapples with its dire crisis of gender-based violence and youth crime, reevaluating and reforming laws and policies like the maternal preference rule that systematically diminish the role of fathers must be an urgent priority. Young lives, and the nation's future, may depend on it.


Democratizing Science: The Case for Anecdotal Evidence in Policy Making 
Published on LinkedIn 270324

Throughout history, the process of policy-making has evolved alongside the growth and complexity of human societies. In the early days of small, close-knit communities, decisions that impacted the group were often based on the lived experiences and anecdotal evidence shared by family representatives in village leadership councils. 
This approach allowed for real-time, responsive decision-making that took into account the unique circumstances and needs of each household.

As societies grew larger and more complex, however, this direct connection between policymakers and constituents became increasingly difficult to maintain. The distance between those in power and the people on the ground necessitated a shift towards statistical abstraction as a means of gathering data and informing policy decisions. While this approach has its merits in terms of convenience and expediency, it has also led to a number of unintended consequences and policy failures.

One of the key issues with relying solely on statistical abstraction is that it can often be misinterpreted as representing the reality of individual lives. As Thomas Sowell argues in his writings, statistical averages and aggregates can obscure important nuances and variations within populations. For example, when examining wealth disparities between racial groups, statistical abstractions often fail to account for factors such as age and population size. A racial group with a predominantly young population that has not yet had the opportunity to accumulate wealth will inevitably appear poorer compared to a group with an aging population, even if other factors are at play.

Similarly, the oft-cited gender wage gap can be misleading when viewed purely through the lens of statistical abstraction. As exemplified by my own mother alongside countless others across the globe, and highlighted by Phyllis Schlafly, numerous women consciously opt for traditional roles as homemakers and caregivers. In these roles, they find both fulfilment and value, embracing these pursuits with intention and pride.

When policies are based on the assumption that all women desire or require full-time formal careers or employment outside the home, they can inadvertently disadvantage and marginalise those who have made different choices. Their suffering is compounded by the diversion of a substantial amount of income earned by their husbands in fulfilling their traditional roles to them as their wives is instead diverted towards causes that prioritise formal academic and career pursuits. Ultimately, the same policies aimed at uplifting women into formal education and careers come at the expense of the women at home who also have no interest in formal careers, as their careers of being homemakers supported by their husbands and adult sons are fulfilling enough.

The limitations of statistical abstraction have been particularly evident in South Africa over the past 30 years. Despite the promise of democracy and equality ushered in by the end of apartheid, the country continues to grapple with persistent social and economic challenges. Many of the policies implemented during this period, often based on populist ideals and statistical abstractions, have failed to deliver the desired outcomes and have even exacerbated issues such as poverty, racism, and corruption.

In light of these failures, it is clear that a new approach to policy-making is needed – one that harnesses the power of anecdotal evidence and lived experiences alongside statistical data. The rise of social media has created unprecedented opportunities for democratizing science and bridging the gap between policymakers and constituents. With the widespread availability of smartphones and internet access, it is now possible to gather real-time, nuanced data directly from individuals on the ground.

By incorporating this anecdotal evidence into the policy-making process, we can develop a more comprehensive and responsive approach to addressing social and economic challenges. This shift towards a "science for the people" model also calls into question the allocation of funding for formal scientific inquiry, particularly when the results of such research have often failed to translate into effective policies.

Of course, this approach is not without its challenges. Ensuring the reliability and representativeness of anecdotal evidence, as well as integrating it with traditional statistical methods, will require careful consideration and the development of new methodologies. Additionally, the legal and regulatory frameworks that govern policy-making will need to adapt to keep pace with the rapidly evolving social and technological landscape.

Despite these challenges, the potential benefits of democratizing science and embracing anecdotal evidence in policy-making are too significant to ignore. By empowering individuals to share their lived experiences and perspectives, we can develop policies that are more responsive to the needs and aspirations of diverse communities. As South Africa looks to the future, it is clear that a new approach is needed – one that combines the best of statistical abstraction and anecdotal evidence to create a more inclusive, equitable, and prosperous society for all.


Title: Rethinking Competence: The Shortcomings of Formal Qualifications as a Criterion.

Introduction.
In today's society, the value placed on formal qualifications as a measure of competence is deeply ingrained. Qualification scandals in South Africa, which highlight a rising trend of high-profile figures lying about their credentials, illustrate this point. Even in supposedly well-qualified workforces, systemic failures in governance and service delivery persist as indicated by the country’s declining socio economic conditions. 
These events raise a crucial question: What truly defines competence in today's world? This article delves into the limitations of overemphasizing formal qualifications as the gold standard for measuring ability. We'll explore historical examples, contemporary challenges, and insights from academic research to paint a more nuanced picture of what makes someone truly competent.

The Parenting Paradox.
Consider the most demanding job of all: raising children. Parents throughout history have tackled this monumental task without formal qualifications. Their success in raising you to adulthood is a testament to their competence. Despite lacking "degrees in parenting," they navigated sleepless nights, scraped knees, and teenage angst. Their expertise emerged from experience, love, and trial-and-error. If credentials were the sole measure of competence, then your parents, despite raising you successfully, would be deemed incompetent at parenting.

The Illusion of Meritocracy.
The myth of meritocracy built on formal qualifications suggests a world where individuals rise based purely on skill and ability. However, reality paints a far more complex picture.  High-profile scandals in South Africa, where individuals fabricated credentials to secure prestigious positions, illustrate this point.
In a system overly fixated on qualifications, the ability to navigate the academic hurdles – not necessarily the ability to do the job – becomes the key to advancement. This becomes even more evident in senior positions, where individuals with impressive degrees may make decisions about jobs they've never held.

Furthermore, lax verification processes within government, state-owned, and even private entities exacerbate the issue.  This fosters an environment where deception thrives.
Moreover, the emphasis on formal education as the primary pathway to success neglects alternative forms of learning and experience. Historically, leaders and innovators rose to prominence based on their achievements and practical skills rather than formal credentials. From ancient military generals to modern-day entrepreneurs, many influential figures lacked formal qualifications but demonstrated exceptional competence through their actions.

The Myth of Professionalism and Efficiency.
Proponents of formal qualifications argue that they act as a gateway to professionalism and efficiency in both public and private sectors. However, the South African experience paints a different picture. Despite a shift towards formal qualifications since 1994, the country continues to grapple with issues in governance, service delivery, and economic development. 
Many key positions in government and state-owned enterprises are filled with highly credentialed  individuals, yet systemic failures and corruption persist.  Some South African businesses that were once globally competitive have fallen from grace.  Ironically, these companies achieved their peak performance before the era of credentialism became dominant, raising questions about the true drivers of success.
Furthermore, the focus on formal qualifications overlooks the importance of practical experience and adaptability in real-world scenarios. While academic credentials may provide a foundation of knowledge, they do not guarantee the ability to navigate complex challenges or make effective decisions in dynamic environments. Competence is not solely derived from theoretical expertise but also from practical skills, critical thinking, and emotional intelligence.

Entitlement and Complacency.
One of the unintended consequences of prioritizing formal qualifications is the sense of entitlement that accompanies them. Individuals who hold prestigious degrees or certifications may feel entitled to positions of authority or privilege, regardless of their practical abilities or contributions. This entitlement can lead to complacency and a lack of motivation to continually prove one's competence through actions and achievements.
Conversely, individuals without formal qualifications often possess a strong work ethic and a determination to succeed based on merit alone. These individuals recognize the need to continuously demonstrate their capabilities through tangible results, rather than relying on credentials as a substitute for competence. Iconic household brands such as Sasol, Pepkor, and Pick n Pay owe their existence not to diplomas and degrees, but to the unwavering commitment of individuals who dedicated themselves to the success of these enterprises.

The Limitations of Academic Research.
Another area where the shortcomings of formal qualifications become apparent is in academic research. While obtaining advanced degrees such as master's or doctoral qualifications may signify expertise in a particular field, the value of the research conducted during the pursuit of these degrees is often limited. Many graduate students focus solely on fulfilling the requirements of their degree programs, conducting research that serves primarily as a means to an end rather than contributing meaningfully to their respective fields.

As a result, despite an abundance of master's and doctoral holders, South Africa lags behind in research and innovation compared to other countries. The emphasis on academic credentials as markers of competence overlooks the importance of practical research experience, collaboration, and real-world application of knowledge. Competence in research should be measured not only by the attainment of formal qualifications but also by the impact and relevance of one's contributions to advancing knowledge and addressing societal challenges.

Conclusion: Rethinking Competence.
In conclusion, the overemphasis on formal qualifications as a criterion for determining competence is deeply flawed. Recent events in South Africa, coupled with historical precedents and academic discourse, highlight the limitations and shortcomings of this approach. 
Competence cannot be reduced to a piece of paper or a string of letters after one's name; it is a multifaceted concept that encompasses practical skills, experience, ethical conduct, and the ability to adapt to changing circumstances. At best, formal qualifications—degrees, diplomas, certifications—are prima facie evidence of competency.

Moving forward, it is essential to adopt a more holistic and nuanced understanding of competence that recognizes the value of practical experience, critical thinking, and ethical behaviour alongside formal qualifications. This paradigm shift requires a reevaluation of existing systems and practices, including education, recruitment, and performance evaluation, to ensure that competence is accurately assessed and rewarded. By embracing a broader definition of competence, we can foster a more inclusive and equitable society where individuals are judged not solely by their credentials, but by their actions and contributions to the common good.
PROMPT
The problem with Qualifications as a criteria for assessing competency

South Africa has been rocked by a series of high profile individuals who were found to have lied about their qualifications on their resumes. Amongst other high profile cases include Pallo Jordan, the former minister of arts and culture who lied about his qualifications, Ellen Tshabalala, former SABC Chairperson, Hlaudi Mostoeneng who used to be the former SABC COO, Daniel Mthimkulu who formerly worked for PRASA and most recently Thabi Leoka.
Considering the high profile jobs these individuals occupied and bow lucrative they are with some being paid millions, the incentive to lie is clear. It is no coincidence that a substantial proportion of these cases involved state owned entities, perhaps the perception being that state owned entities and government are not as thorough in their screening and verification. Amongst the biggest revelations for South Africans in recent years was the Zondo commission, which essentially found out that the ruling party is nothing more that a criminal syndicate mascarading as a political party. Their criminal acts while occupying the highest positions in government and in charge of critical offices like the judiciary and police have depleted the country’s moral fibre that the weak willed are easily swayed to criminality as inspired by the political leaders they look up to. 
The incentive to lie for the lucrative and prestigious positions is so much that even criminalisation of lying or misrepresenting one’s qualifications by the National Qualifications Framework Amendment Act 12 of 2019 there are still more individuals who are getting exposed. If one considers that in addition to her multiple board positions in high profile companies in the country Thabi Leoka was also an advisor to the president at some point. 

The reality is that as much as these cases that have been exposed, most likely there’s even much more that have not been reported or discovered. This is especially true considering that in the government and state owned entities verification controls are so low that even positions as high as a chief operating officer or chairperson can go undetected. If the controls are that lax for those levels can you imagine how bad their are at lower levels?
While the prevalence of fake qualifications rising is a enough of a concern by itself, a bigger concern that is seldom explored is the rise of the culture in society that values people’s worth by their qualifications, despite evidence that proves the contrary.
Since 1994 South Africa has prioritised formal systems, starting with formal education being prioritised over all other forms of education like homeschool that have long existed for almost 99% of humanity’s existence. In employment a focus was placed on grading jobs by qualification with the prerequisite that a candidate must possess the qualification in order to apply for a specific job. This shift and focus on formal system was said to be better for the country, will bring professionalism and efficiency in government and private companies alike, and will ultimately lead to the prosperity of the country. Formal systems were supposed to eliminate cheating because holding a qualification from an accredited institution was going to eliminate favouritism, nepotism, appointing incompetent people and so on.
The problem however is that even at best, 30 years after democratic south africa and this focus on formal systems the country is worse of. The highly schooled adults who attended formal schools are mostly unemployed as yoth unemployment is above 60%. 
These individuals, despite holding qualifications are dependant on their parents most of who who never went to formal schools. They also depend of the taxpayer as the country’s grant recipients far outstrip the taxpayers, showing the level of perpetual children supported by the taxpayer.
Most of the state owned entities and government departments including municipalities have collapsed despite most having appointed qualified people as per their degrees, diplomas and phds. There is barely a day that goes on without service delivery protests in the country due to poor or none delivery of services in municipalities as big as the City of Johannesburg which recently experience water shortages for almost 10 days in some areas allegedly because someone shut off a valve. The country’s economy is possibly the worst performing amongst comparable countries with the trajectory of south africa resembling Zimbabwe than the prosperous rainbow nation we were promised.
This means even in the best of cases, assuming that indeed most individuals who are employed in formal positions have formal qualifications according to their job grading, using qualifications as a criteria to determine competence for the job has overall resulted in non performing of failed government and state owned companies with most value wiped of former high performing companies like elllies. Once again it is important to note that all this erasure in the value of the economy of the country happened just as the focus was on qualifications as a means of ensuring one can do the job. 
In ancient history most leaders and prominent people in society rose to those positions based on their experience, their past acts that deemed them suitable for the role. Competence was determine based on ones achievements instead of superficial words on a degree or diploma. 
Most rules ascended to their throne by starting from the frontline of the battlefield and rising through the ranks to earn the respect of their colleagues and countrymen who then voted them into positions or supported their ascent. From Julius Caeser to Cicro and Virgil in ancient rome, none of these prominent figures were appointed based on qualifications but demonstrable acts through experience. Chaucer, Dante
, Leonardo da Vinci, Nicolaus Copernicus, Galileo Galilei, Sir Francis Bacon, all had no formal qualifications and had to earn the respect of the people through demonstrable acts. South Africa, as is africa is also full of historical figures who achieved great prominence long before the era of qualifications including king Hintsa who went on to unite the tribes in the Eastern Cape region under the Xhosa Nation as some of the greatest military generals like Hannibal and Shaka Zulu.
At face value it seems plausible to judge people’s competency based on their qualifications, if not for any reason this has been repeated so often by formal schooling advocates who have large taxpayer funds to buy the media as well as other prominent figures and platforms to be their mouthpieces. The reality however is that the flaws of using formal qualifications as a  criteria to determine competence are evident when interrogates the process that people go through to get these qualifications, the formal schooling system. Bryan Caplan does a great job in interrogating the formal education system as well as its flaws, why the model is not ideal. Kevin Silmer and Robin Hanson also explore the topic of formal education and qualifications in The Elephant in the brain. 
When one considers that at best formal qualifications are at best prima facie evidence of competency and acknowledge that one will still need at least 6 months to prove they can do the job by demonstrating it. 
A person with no formal qualification knows from the beginning they have to work to earn their position and rely on demonstrable achievements instead of words on a piece of paper. As a consequence the people with qualifications tend to have a higher sense of entitlement to positions since society has created this perception white people without qualifications tend to be hard workers since they know in order to advance they must show they can do the job. There are many people who built prominent companies in south africa through experience without qualifications, the founder of shoprite group being one of the examples. Even at the highest level qualifications do not reflect competency, taking masters and PHD research as one of the examples. Most people who hold academic phd and masters qualifications who had to submit a research as a prerequisite to get their qualification never conducted any other research other than for the purposes of getting the qualification. This means that even the value of the research that they do to get their qualification is only ever read by the people who grade the person and few researchers who are looking for material to reference. Despite having more masters and PHD holders south africa is poor when it comes to research, innovation. 
Can you write a detailed 3000 word article that takes into consideration the above and expands on the shortcomings of using formal qualifications as a criteria for determining competence? Also include in the article that despite the focus on qualifications, their relevance is insignificant when it comes to the most important part of life, child rearing. Most of us were raised, the worldover, throughout history were raised by parents who  held no formal qualifications that certified that they could do the job. Yet, through experience they did the job. The fact that you are alive to read this is a testament of your parents competency at raising you to adulthood, yet neither have a qualification that says they can do the job, even with you as testament of their competence. Consider the points I make in my book, the Homeschooling father how and why I got started which is available from here: https://youtu.be/xlKSQ3gFTWA?si=cHgyDfzbBmePy4tk. Consider these chapters from the book: 03:43:26 The danger of equating formal schooling with teaching and qualifications for knowledge.

03:45:35 Unarticulated knowledge and uncredentialed expertise.

03:47:47 Articulated knowledge and credentialed expertise.

03:51:25 The value of personal experience over credentialed expertise.

03:56:53 Physician, heal thyself.





Reassessing Post-Apartheid Policies: A Critical Examination of Affirmative Action, Land Redistribution, and Economic Empowerment in South Africa

Introduction:
Since the dawn of democracy in 1994, South Africa has implemented various policies aimed at redressing the injustices of apartheid and promoting inclusive socio-economic development. However, the outcomes of these policies often diverge from their intended objectives, raising questions about their efficacy and underlying assumptions. This article examines the outcomes of key policies such as affirmative action, land redistribution, Black Economic Empowerment (BEE), and women empowerment, using both intended objectives and real-life outcomes as benchmarks.

Affirmative Action:
Affirmative action policies were introduced to address historical injustices and promote racial and gender equality in employment and education. However, critics argue that these policies have often led to tokenism, reverse discrimination, and a focus on meeting quotas rather than addressing systemic inequalities. Thomas Sowell's critique of affirmative action as perpetuating a victimhood mentality among beneficiaries offers valuable insights into its unintended consequences.

Land Redistribution:
Land redistribution policies aimed to rectify the dispossession of black South Africans under apartheid by redistributing land ownership. Despite ambitious targets, the pace of land reform has been slow, with challenges such as bureaucratic inefficiencies, lack of adequate support for emerging farmers, and resistance from vested interests. Moeletsi Mbeki's analysis of the structural barriers to effective land reform underscores the complexities of addressing historical injustices within a market-driven economy.

Black Economic Empowerment (BEE):
BEE policies sought to empower black South Africans economically through measures such as preferential procurement, ownership targets, and skills development. While BEE has created opportunities for some black entrepreneurs and professionals, it has also been criticized for fostering crony capitalism, enriching a black elite, and failing to uplift the broader black population. Milton Friedman's warning against judging policies by their intentions rather than their results is particularly relevant in evaluating the outcomes of BEE.

Women Empowerment:
Policies promoting women's empowerment aimed to address gender disparities in education, employment, and leadership positions. While progress has been made in increasing female representation in various sectors and some women have benefited from these, the majority of the women are not doing well. If the country has unemployment above 60 percent for the youth overall that ought to give an indicator that like everyone in the country women are no better off since these programs. The increase in Gender-based violence is second only to the taxpayer money paid to mainly politically connected  individuals and bureaucrats in organisations that have benefited from the suffering of not only women, but the country as a whole. 

Overall Performance:
Despite the implementation of these policies, South Africa continues to grapple with high levels of unemployment, poverty, inequality, and social unrest. The gap between the intended objectives of post-apartheid policies and their real-life outcomes underscores the importance of critically evaluating their effectiveness and recalibrating strategies where necessary.

Conclusion:
As South Africa reflects on three decades of post-apartheid governance, it is imperative to reassess the impact of key policies on socio-economic development. By drawing from the insights of scholars like Thomas Sowell, Moeletsi Mbeki, and Milton Friedman, policymakers can gain a deeper understanding of the complexities and unintended consequences of policy interventions. Moving forward, there is a pressing need for evidence-based policymaking that prioritizes tangible results over ideological aspirations, ensuring that policies truly empower all South Africans and pave the way for inclusive and sustainable development.


Title: Reevaluating Policy Making in Post-Apartheid South Africa: Learning from Historical Realities and Thomas Sowell's Insights

Introduction:

Policy making in South Africa has been deeply influenced by statistical abstractions, particularly in the post-apartheid era. However, the country's socioeconomic performance over the past 30 years raises questions about the efficacy of this approach. Drawing from the insights of Thomas Sowell and the real-life experiences of post-apartheid South Africa, this article examines the strengths and weaknesses of statistical abstraction as a basis for policy making and explores alternative approaches informed by historical evidence.

Understanding Statistical Abstraction:

Statistical abstraction involves the use of quantitative data and statistical analyses to inform policy decisions. While this approach provides valuable insights into socioeconomic trends and disparities, its limitations become apparent when applied in complex and dynamic contexts such as South Africa.

Thomas Sowell's Critique:

Thomas Sowell's work, particularly "Discrimination and Disparities," offers valuable insights into the shortcomings of relying solely on statistical abstractions in policy making. Sowell challenges the notion that statistical disparities necessarily imply biased treatment or genetic deficiencies, urging policymakers to consider the broader array of factors that shape socioeconomic outcomes.

Historical Realities in South Africa:

The democratic era in South Africa, which has prevailed for 30 years, offers a wealth of real-life evidence on the consequences of policy decisions informed by statistical abstraction. Despite significant progress in certain areas, such as access to basic services, the country continues to grapple with persistent challenges. While it might be a feat for the ruling party to boast that since it came to power more homes have access to water, electricity and basic services that means very little when there is any seldom reliable electricity supply nationwide, water infrastructure is collapsing while most of the taps that were installed have long run dry. Public services like education, health and others have all but collapsed, if not closed due to water or loadshedding then there’s another reason. Other issues include high unemployment, crime, corruption, and service delivery failures.

Lessons Learned:

The experiences of post-apartheid South Africa serve as a cautionary tale about the limitations of statistical abstraction in predicting policy outcomes. Historical realities highlight the need for policymakers to adopt a more nuanced and context-sensitive approach that considers the complexities of socioeconomic dynamics and acknowledges the legacy of apartheid.

Moving Forward:

Instead of relying solely on statistical abstractions, policymakers should draw from historical evidence and real-life experiences to inform policy decisions. This includes examining the outcomes of similar policies implemented between 1994 and 2019 to identify patterns, trends, and unintended consequences.

Alternative Approaches:

Complementary approaches, such as qualitative research methods, participatory approaches, and mixed-methods approaches, offer valuable insights into the lived experiences and perspectives of diverse communities. By incorporating these alternative approaches into the policymaking process, policymakers can better understand the root causes of social problems and design more effective interventions.

Conclusion:

The experiences of post-apartheid South Africa underscore the importance of reevaluating the role of statistical abstraction in policy making. By learning from historical realities and integrating insights from scholars like Thomas Sowell, policymakers can adopt a more holistic and context-sensitive approach that promotes inclusive development and addresses the complex challenges facing the country. As South Africa navigates its path forward, it must draw from both statistical evidence and real-life experiences to craft policies that truly reflect the needs and aspirations of its diverse population.


Legality is not Morality: Examining the Failures of Fair Discrimination in Post-Apartheid South Africa

South Africa is a country that has been shaped by its history of colonialism and apartheid, which imposed racial segregation. The constitutional order that emerged after the democratic transition in 1994 was designed to address the historical injustices of apartheid and provide redress for its victims. The ultimate aim was to build a society where everyone, regardless of race or gender, has equal opportunities and rights, and where the wounds of apartheid are acknowledged and healed.
The process of redress, however has also been marked by paradoxes and controversies, especially regarding the use of discrimination as a tool for empowerment. The Constitution allows for the implementation of affirmative action measures to promote the advancement of disadvantaged groups, such as black people, women, and people with disabilities. These measures are intended to correct the imbalances and inequalities caused by past discrimination, and to ensure fair representation and participation in all spheres of society.
As a critic of this approach I argue that these measures amount to reverse discrimination, and that they create new forms of exclusion and resentment among those who are not beneficiaries of affirmative action. Affirmative action violates the principle of equality and merit, and that it perpetuates racial and gender stereotypes and divisions. These measures have also been in place for three decades in this country, as such we have more than enough evidence of their consequences.
As an individual who adheres to the principle of justice, the basic principle of my morality is the golden rule, because if I wouldn’t want it done to me why would I do it to someone else? Unless I am seeking revenge, advocating for an injustice to be perpetrated against another just because it was done to me or my ancestor is contrary to my morality. The whole point of advocating for any injustice to be stopped is so that no one else suffers such an injustice, bar for extreme cases where one has chosen to be exempted from such rules by their actions.
The entire purpose of opposing apartheid was to establish a democratic South Africa, where everyone is equal before the law, regardless of race or gender. The reintroduction of discrimination in any form during the democratic era was inconceivable for most of us, as it contradicted everything we fought against during apartheid.
That is why I strongly oppose any form of state-sanctioned discrimination, even as a means of redress. Discrimination should be condemned regardless of the target group, whether it is directed towards black people, women, Indians, colored people, white people, or men. It is a fundamental principle that fairness and equality should be upheld for all individuals, regardless of their race or gender. Therefore, any form of discrimination is equally reprehensible and deplorable, irrespective of who it is targeted against, nor the grounds for its justification.
The core objection was to the use of race and gender as a basis for discrimination, regardless of who it targeted. The aim was to transition from a society that judged individuals based on their skin color or gender to one that embraced equality and fairness for everyone.
State-sanctioned discrimination in democratic South Africa, shielded under the same section 9 of the constitution that denounces discrimination, has almost paralyzed the nation. The detrimental consequences of such discrimination have been evident in the social, economic, and political spheres of South Africa, hindering the progress and unity of the country as a whole.
Advocates for women’s empowerment and equality should be mindful not to become what they are fighting against, particularly when it comes at the expense of men. It is unreasonable to expect men, who are bound by traditional roles, to help women escape their traditional roles. This would be considered hypocritical in the fight for women’s emancipation. However, this does not mean that women should compromise or sacrifice their rights and interests for the sake of appeasing or accommodating men. Rather, it means that women should be what they claim to stand for, independent of the disproportionate share of the taxpayer funds they currently receive, a majority of which is paid for by men.
I am opposed to women's empowerment programs because they divert resources from the women who depend on me: my mother, wife or girlfriend, daughter, sister, and niece. It is unfair to support women without any connection to my family's well-being, neglecting those who are my responsibility. Prioritizing women in these programs takes from the earnings of men who provide for the real women positively contributing to their lives and raising their children. The majority of the funding for girls and women empowerment programs comes from taxes, most of which is paid by men, excluding them as well as boys.
Even worse is that these "empowered women '' who are provided for by tax money which was meant for the man's family often become even more of a liability, not only to the man but the women the man provides for as well. It is not uncommon for a man to be swayed from his responsibilities by some unmarried women who superficially seems attractive. This means not only did the wife of that man suffer because she did not receive her husbands income she was entitled to but also that funded the woman who eventually stole her husband.
The entire purpose of opposing apartheid was to establish a democratic South Africa, where everyone is equal before the law, regardless of race or gender. The reintroduction of discrimination in any form during the democratic era was inconceivable for most of us, as it contradicted everything we fought against during apartheid.
That is why I strongly oppose any form of state-sanctioned discrimination, even as a means of redress. Discrimination should be condemned regardless of the target group, whether it is directed towards black people, women, Indians, colored people, white people, or men. It is a fundamental principle that fairness and equality should be upheld for all individuals, regardless of their race or gender. Therefore, any form of discrimination is equally reprehensible and deplorable, irrespective of who it is targeted against nor the grounds for its justification.
The core objection was to the use of race and gender as a basis for discrimination, regardless of who it targeted. The aim was to transition from a society that judged individuals based on their skin color or gender to one that embraced equality and fairness for everyone.
State-sanctioned discrimination in democratic South Africa, shielded under the same section 9 of the constitution that denounces discrimination, has almost paralyzed the nation. The detrimental consequences of such discrimination have been evident in the social, economic, and political spheres of South Africa, hindering the progress and unity of the country as a whole.
Advocates for women’s empowerment and equality should be mindful not to become what they are fighting against, particularly when it comes at the expense of men. It is unreasonable to expect men, who are bound by traditional roles, to help women escape their traditional roles. This would be considered hypocritical in the fight for women’s emancipation. However, this does not mean that women should compromise or sacrifice their rights and interests for the sake of appeasing or accommodating men. Rather, it means that women should be what they claim to stand for, independent of the disproportionate share of the taxpayer funds they currently receive, a majority of which is paid for by men.
I am opposed to women's empowerment programs because they divert resources from the women who depend on me: my mother, wife, daughter, sister, and niece. It is unfair to support women without any connection to my family's well-being, neglecting those who are my responsibility. Prioritizing women in these programs takes from the earnings of men who provide for the real women positively contributing to their lives and raising their children. The majority of the funding for girls and women empowerment programs comes from taxes, most of which is paid by men, excluding them as well as boys.
Even worse is that these "empowered women" who are provided for by tax money which was meant for the man's family often become even more of a liability, not only to the man but the women the man provides for as well. It is not uncommon for a man to be swayed from his responsibilities by some unmarried women who superficially seems attractive. This means not only did the wife of that man suffer because she did not receive her husbands income she was entitled to but also that funded the woman who eventually stole her husband.

The primary objective in opposing apartheid was to create a democratic South Africa that firmly supports the principle of equal treatment under the law, irrespective of race or gender. The idea of reintroducing any kind of discrimination in the post-apartheid era is completely inconceivable, as it negates the very essence of what we fought for during the struggle against apartheid. It is deeply disheartening to witness that South Africans are now more divided, economically disadvantaged, and in a worse state compared to pre-democratic times. This serves as a powerful testament to the inherent immorality of any form of discrimination, even if it were to be legalized by the highest authority, the Constitution.
Morality and legality are not equivalent!


The hypocrisy of it all.
Supporters of redress unanimously acknowledge the injustice inherent in discrimination, particularly when endorsed by the state. This sentiment resonates not only with them but also with the broader Western world. The rationale behind this consensus is that, as a method to rectify initial discrimination, subsequent acts of discrimination are deemed justifiable. Consequently, those ardently advocating for redress in response to past discrimination, even through the means of employing further discrimination, should be diligent in upholding their commitment to discriminating solely to advance equality. In doing so, these advocates, as entities, must embody the desired state of fairness, setting an example for the broader society to follow. So is this the case?

The Commission for Gender Equality.
Chapter 9 of the South African Constitution establishes a set of state institutions that support constitutional democracy in the Republic. Amongst these institutions is the Commission for Gender Equality (CGE).
The CGE’s vision is "A society free from all forms of gender inequality" while its mission is "To promote, protect, monitor and evaluate gender equality through research, public education, policy development, legislative initiatives, effective monitoring and litigation."
Among the entity's values which include independence, confidentiality and accountability, there is also a commitment to non-discrimination and ethical behaviour.
Initially, the CGE had a staff of 29 employees. In the 1997/1998 financial year, almost 70% of our budget was allocated to employee compensation. During that time, 62% of our staff consisted of women, while the remaining positions were occupied by men.
As per our 2022/2023 Annual Performance Plan, the staff complement has grown significantly to 229 employees, with 78.56% being female. In this period, 70% of our budget amounting to R100,722,000.00 was dedicated to employee compensation.
By now you would have noticed the glaring disparities between the commission’s employee profile relative to the country’s gender profile.


The South African Human Rights Commission promotes human rights and monitors their observance, while also having powers to investigate violations, seek redress, conduct research, educate, and gather information from relevant organs of state.
Commission for the Promotion and Protection of the Rights of Cultural, Religious and Linguistic Communitiesmmission promotes respect for cultural, religious, and linguistic communities, peace, unity, and equality, and has powers to monitor, investigate, and report on related issues. 
The Commission for Gender Equality must promote respect for gender equality and the protection, development and attainment of gender equality.
The Commission for Gender Equality has the power, as regulated by national legislation, necessary to perform its functions, including the power to monitor, investigate, research, educate, lobby, advise and report on issues concerning gender equality.
The Commission for Gender Equality has the additional powers and functions prescribed by national legislation.

According to the South Africa’s National Policy Framework for Women’s Empowerment and Gender Equality, the following are some of the significant challenges facing the country in its quest for gender equality;
Women and Economic Participation
Promoting women’s economic participation through entrepreneurship, employment, and financial inclusion is vital.
Women and Education
Improving educational opportunities for women is crucial. Ensuring equal access to quality education and addressing gender-based barriers are priorities.
Women and Information Communication Technologies (ICT)
Bridging the digital gender gap and promoting women’s participation in ICT are key goals.
Women in Decision-Making and Power
Equal representation in leadership positions and decision-making processes is essential for achieving gender equality.
Gender-Based Violence (GBV):
While the legal framework plays a crucial role, addressing gender-based violence remains urgent, with South Africa's femicide rate emphasizing the need to combat violence against women.
Women and Poverty
Addressing economic disparities and ensuring women’s access to financial resources are essential steps toward empowerment, as poverty disproportionately affects women.
Women and Health
Enhancing women’s health involves access to quality healthcare, reproductive services, and addressing HIV/AIDS, with special attention given to girls and young women in the fight against HIV.
Women and Housing, Welfare, and Land
Ensuring safe housing, social welfare, and land rights for women are critical components of empowerment.

As a result of apartheid, the largest population group in South Africa is ironically the most protected with privileges that justify the same discrimination that the current redress measures supposedly correct. It does not stop there, because Black women also get extra protection and benefits.
The argument is that women, as a group, were oppressed by men. Patriarchy denied them formal education and employment opportunities, making them dependent on their traditional roles. Therefore, women are vulnerable as a group and deserve redress for historical injustices.
The first irony with this is that Black women are presented as a monolith, as though all of them aspired for the things that the patriarchy supposedly denied them. The problem with this however is that it is a blatant lie, not least because just like Black people, women are not a monolith that has the same aspirations and dreams. 
Examining opportunities denied to women provides insight into the injustice they faced during apartheid in South Africa. It's important to ascertain if a majority of women were disproportionately affected by apartheid compared to men, or if only a specific segment of the female population suffered negative consequences. Apartheid did, indeed confined black people to certain careers, restricted areas where they could pursue formal education and restricted inter race marriages.
Based on this the woman who was disproportionately affected by apartheid could be said to be the one who aspired to be liberal, formally educated, formal Career Orientated and wanted to be in a non-traditional relationship.
Women with diverse aspirations, including choosing to be homemakers, were not disproportionately affected by the denial of formal education and employment. My mother is an example of such a woman who devoted her life to homemaking, investing most of her time in raising my sisters and me. She never felt burdened by the responsibility of working outside the home, except in emergencies, such as when my father passed away and I was just 2 - 3 years away from being his successor. This responsibility, initially my father's, has now fallen to me as his successor, a duty I execute diligently, as long as it is for the women that are fully invested in the wellbeing of his descendants.
Similarly, conservative Xhosa women may not be greatly concerned about legal prohibition from marrying someone of a different race.
It has been an astonishing 30 years since any of these restrictions were criminalized. In that same timeframe, women have not only experienced a surge in preference and support from taxpayers but also an unprecedented opportunity to embrace their freedom. After three decades of being able to pursue their dreams, a trend has emerged that gives clues about the proportion of women who were denied opportunities.
While the majority of women, just like the majority of men, aspire to acquire a sufficient level of education to thrive in today's society, it is worth acknowledging that advanced formal education can become burdensome and consume valuable time away from family for most individuals.
The 2022 report by Statistics South Africa reveals that the majority of women aged 20 and older are either married, divorced/separated, or widowed. More than half of women are or have been married and prefer the traditional marriage structure over other living arrangements. This suggests that, while women have the opportunity to choose non-traditional relationships, most still opt for the traditional option.
Despite the ability to take on both traditional roles and pursue formal employment, focusing extensively on one aspect often means neglecting other areas.
While a significant number of women have formal jobs, it is primarily out of necessity rather than choice. In my experience, most women I know have chosen formal employment out of necessity, including my grandmothers, mother, sisters, and Tee, who is even more educated than me and should have higher value in the formal employment sector.
The irony is evident, as it becomes clear that most women are not benefiting from empowerment programs. Only a small group of outspoken women, who have the resources to advocate for themselves, are reaping the rewards. This is just the tip of the iceberg.
The majority of homemakers depend entirely on their husbands for financial support. Women's empowerment initiatives are funded by taxes, which are mainly contributed by men who work to support their wives, daughters, and sisters. This dynamic results in the funds for these programs ultimately coming from the majority of women at home, whom the man is responsibly providing for. Any funds diverted to support women's empowerment ultimately undermines the very women that the man is committed to providing for.
If history is anything to go by, and in this case it is, my niece has a far higher chance than most girls her age. This is not because of women empowerment programs but because she has responsible men in her life in her father, brothers and uncle. She can afford to explore whatever career she aspires to and make the most of it, just like her mother, grandmother and great grandmothers were able to excel in homemaking because of me, my father and grandfather who provide for the women in our lives.
The means through which money is obtained for tax-funded programs raises a crucial point: it appears that minority women, who make up the majority of recipients, are deemed more significant than the majority of women who stay at home. This is due to the fact that income tax is deducted even before the earner receives their income.
Consequently, the income of husbands is claimed first by these minority women, while their wives are pushed down to third place. It is ironic that the funding for women empowerment programs, which are intended to promote independence, predominantly comes from income taxes paid by men.
So, instead of receiving money directly from their husbands, female beneficiaries of these programs still rely on funding derived from men. However, the difference lies in the presence of an intermediary who takes a significant portion, leaving only morsels for the majority of women while allocating a larger portion to a select few.
I would be amiss if I didn't add this other glaring irony. Men are supporting programs that aim to free women from their traditional roles by taking on the traditional role of providing for their families through work.







